Missouri, session 2026, HB3340.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 1.2080, to read as follows:
1.2080. Except as provided by a specific appropriation line item, no state agency
shall expend any funds appropriated by the state to:
(1) Lease, build, or retrofit facilities for civil immigration detention; or
(2) Contract to provide ongoing facility operations including, but not limited to,
food, medical, or security functions for civil immigration detainees.

This section shall not be construed to limit or otherwise interfere with information-
sharing requirements of section 67.307 or federal law.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.